Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF464.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2853XS (4) 91 ss/ns S.F. 464 DIVISION I 1 LEGISLATIVE SALARIES 2 Section 1. Section 2.10, subsections 1, 2, and 8, Code 2025, 3 are amended to read as follows: 4 1. Every Subject to the annual adjustments provided in 5 subsection 8, every member of the general assembly except the 6 presiding officer of the senate, the speaker of the house, 7 the majority and minority floor leader of each house, and the 8 president pro tempore of the senate and speaker pro tempore 9 of the house shall receive an annual salary of twenty-five 10 forty-five thousand dollars for the year 2007 2027 and 11 subsequent years while serving as a member of the general 12 assembly. In addition, each such member shall receive a per 13 diem, as defined in subsection 5 , for expenses of office, 14 except travel, for each day the general assembly is in session 15 commencing with the first day of a legislative session and 16 ending with the day of final adjournment of each legislative 17 session as indicated by the journals of the house and senate, 18 except that if the length of the first regular session of the 19 general assembly exceeds one hundred ten calendar days and 20 the second regular session exceeds one hundred calendar days, 21 the payments shall be made only for one hundred ten calendar 22 days for the first session and one hundred calendar days for 23 the second session. Members from Polk county shall receive an 24 amount per day equal to three-fourths of the per diem of the 25 non-Polk county members. Each member shall receive a three 26 four hundred fifty dollar per month allowance for legislative 27 district constituency postage, travel, telephone costs, and 28 other expenses. Travel expenses shall be paid at the rate 29 established by section 8A.363 for actual travel in going to and 30 returning from the seat of government by the nearest traveled 31 route for not more than one time per week during a legislative 32 session unless the general assembly otherwise provides. 33 2. The Subject to the annual adjustments provided in 34 subsection 8, the speaker of the house, presiding officer of 35 -1- LSB 2853XS (4) 91 ss/ns 1/ 7 S.F. 464 the senate, and the majority and minority floor leader of each 1 house shall each receive an annual salary of thirty-seven 2 sixty-seven thousand five hundred dollars for the year 2007 3 2027 and subsequent years while serving in that capacity. 4 The Subject to the annual adjustments provided in subsection 5 8, the president pro tempore of the senate and the speaker 6 pro tempore of the house shall receive an annual salary of 7 twenty-seven forty-nine thousand dollars for the year 2007 2027 8 and subsequent years while serving in that capacity. Expense 9 and travel allowances shall be the same for the speaker of the 10 house and the presiding officer of the senate, the president 11 pro tempore of the senate and the speaker pro tempore of the 12 house, and the majority and minority leader of each house as 13 provided for other members of the general assembly. 14 8. Commencing upon the convening of the Seventy-eighth 15 Ninety-second General Assembly in January 1999 2028 , and for 16 each calendar year thereafter, the annual salaries of members 17 and officers of the general assembly, as the annual salaries 18 existed during the preceding calendar year, shall be adjusted 19 by an amount equal to the average of the annual cost-of-living 20 pay adjustments negotiated for the members of the collective 21 bargaining units represented by the state police officers 22 council labor union, the American federation of state, county, 23 and municipal employees, and the Iowa united professionals for 24 the annual cost-of-living pay adjustment received by executive 25 branch noncontract state employees during the preceding fiscal 26 year beginning July 1, 1997 or three percent, whichever is 27 less . For the calendar year 2000, during the month of January, 28 the annual salaries of members and officers of the general 29 assembly shall be adjusted by an amount equal to the average 30 of the annual cost-of-living pay adjustments received by the 31 members of those collective bargaining units for the fiscal 32 year beginning July 1, 1998. The annual salaries determined 33 for the members and officers as provided in this section for 34 the calendar year 2000 shall remain in effect for subsequent 35 -2- LSB 2853XS (4) 91 ss/ns 2/ 7 S.F. 464 calendar years until otherwise provided by the general 1 assembly. For purposes of this subsection, ânoncontract state 2 employeesâ means state employees not covered by a collective 3 bargaining agreement under chapter 20 and who are not appointed 4 officials. 5 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. The following applies upon the 6 convening of the Ninety-second General Assembly in January 7 2027: 8 The portion of the section of this division of this Act 9 amending section 2.10, subsections 1 and 2. 10 DIVISION II 11 SALARIES OF STATEWIDE ELECTED EXECUTIVE OFFICIALS 12 Sec. 3. Section 7.8, Code 2025, is amended by striking the 13 section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 14 7.8 Salary ââ governor and lieutenant governor. 15 1. Subject to the annual adjustments provided in subsection 16 3, the governor shall receive an annual salary of two hundred 17 thirty thousand dollars, and the lieutenant governor shall 18 receive an annual salary of one hundred eighty thousand 19 dollars. Payment of expenses and any per diem of the 20 lieutenant governor shall be as fixed by the general assembly. 21 2. The salaries of the governor and lieutenant governor 22 shall be paid from moneys appropriated to the office of the 23 governor and lieutenant governor pursuant to any Act of the 24 general assembly. 25 3. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and for each 26 fiscal year thereafter, the annual salaries of the governor and 27 lieutenant governor, as the annual salaries existed during the 28 preceding fiscal year, shall be adjusted by an amount equal to 29 the annual cost-of-living pay adjustment received by executive 30 branch noncontract state employees during the preceding fiscal 31 year, or three percent, whichever is less. For purposes of 32 this subsection, ânoncontract state employeesâ means state 33 employees not covered by a collective bargaining agreement 34 under chapter 20 and who are not appointed officials. 35 -3- LSB 2853XS (4) 91 ss/ns 3/ 7 S.F. 464 Sec. 4. Section 9.5, Code 2025, is amended by striking the 1 section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 2 9.5 Salary. 3 1. Subject to the annual adjustments provided in subsection 4 3, the secretary of state shall receive an annual salary of one 5 hundred eighty thousand dollars. 6 2. The salary of the secretary of state shall be paid from 7 moneys appropriated to the office of the secretary of state 8 pursuant to any Act of the general assembly. 9 3. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and for 10 each fiscal year thereafter, the annual adjusted salary of the 11 secretary of state shall be adjusted as described in section 12 7.8, subsection 3. 13 Sec. 5. Section 11.30, Code 2025, is amended by striking the 14 section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 15 11.30 Salary. 16 1. Subject to the annual adjustments provided in subsection 17 3, the auditor of state shall receive an annual salary of one 18 hundred eighty thousand dollars. 19 2. The salary of the auditor of state shall be paid from 20 moneys appropriated to the office of the auditor of state 21 pursuant to any Act of the general assembly. 22 3. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and for 23 each fiscal year thereafter, the annual adjusted salary of the 24 auditor of state shall be adjusted as described in section 7.8, 25 subsection 3. 26 Sec. 6. Section 12.18, Code 2025, is amended by striking the 27 section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 28 12.18 Salary. 29 1. Subject to the annual adjustments provided in subsection 30 3, the treasurer of state shall receive an annual salary of one 31 hundred eighty thousand dollars. 32 2. The salary of the treasurer of state shall be paid from 33 moneys appropriated to the office of the treasurer of state 34 pursuant to any Act of the general assembly. 35 -4- LSB 2853XS (4) 91 ss/ns 4/ 7 S.F. 464 3. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and for 1 each fiscal year thereafter, the annual adjusted salary of the 2 treasurer of state shall be adjusted as described in section 3 7.8, subsection 3. 4 Sec. 7. Section 13.9, Code 2025, is amended by striking the 5 section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 6 13.9 Salary. 7 1. Subject to the annual adjustments provided in subsection 8 3, the attorney general shall receive an annual salary of two 9 hundred ten thousand dollars. 10 2. The salary of the attorney general shall be paid from 11 moneys appropriated to the department of justice pursuant to 12 any Act of the general assembly. 13 3. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and for 14 each fiscal year thereafter, the annual adjusted salary of the 15 attorney general shall be adjusted as described in section 7.8, 16 subsection 3. 17 4. The salaries of the chief deputy attorney general and 18 other deputy and assistant attorneys general shall be such as 19 may be fixed by law. 20 Sec. 8. Section 159.19, Code 2025, is amended by striking 21 the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 22 159.19 Salary. 23 1. Subject to the annual adjustments provided in subsection 24 3, the secretary of agriculture shall receive an annual salary 25 of one hundred eighty thousand dollars. 26 2. The salary of the secretary of agriculture shall be paid 27 from moneys appropriated to the department pursuant to any Act 28 of the general assembly. 29 3. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and for 30 each fiscal year thereafter, the annual adjusted salary for 31 the secretary of agriculture shall be adjusted as described in 32 section 7.8, subsection 3. 33 Sec. 9. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act takes 34 effect upon the commencement of the first pay period for 35 -5- LSB 2853XS (4) 91 ss/ns 5/ 7 S.F. 464 executive branch state employees following the enactment of 1 this Act. 2